DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-233
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XE-03

DTC |c1225/25t0Cc 1228/28| TRC & VSC Solenoid Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The TRC & VSC solenoid operates in accordance with signals from the ECU and raises the fluid pressure
in and releases it from the brake cylinders.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

OpenorshortcircuitforSA 1 circuitcontinuesfor0.0 15sdc.  «Hydraulic brake booster
C1225/25 L

or more. * SA1 circuit

Openorshortcircuitfor SA2 circuit continues for 0.0 15s¢c. e« Hydraulicbrake booster
C1226/26 oo

or more. * SA2circuit

Openor shortcircuitfor SA3 circuit continues for 0.0 15s¢c. e« Hydraulicbrake booster
C1227/27 -

or more. * SA3circuit

Openor shortcircuitfor STR circuit continues for 0.0 15 ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
C1228/28 .

sec. or more. ¢ STRcircuit
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BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-235
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check TRC & VSC solenoid.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminals A48 - 4 and A50 - 5, 6, 11
and 12 of hydraulic brake booster.
OK:
Continuity
HINT:
Resistance of each solenoid at 20 °C (68 ° F)
SA1, SA2, STR: 4.05 - 4.55 Q
SA3:6.95 - 7.45 Q

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster.

@

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between skid control
ECU and hydraulic brake booster (See page IN-38).

@

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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